Wisconsin, session 2025, SB226.
do enact as follows:SB226,11Section 1. 801.50 (3c) of the statutes is created to read:SB226,2,32801.50 (3c) In determining whether a county is a proper venue under sub. (2) 3(c), the court may not consider the participation of any of the following:SB226,2,54(a) A party joined to the civil action or special proceeding pursuant to s. 5803.03.SB226,2,76(b) An insurer joined to the civil action or special proceeding pursuant to s. 7803.04.SB226,28Section 2. 801.50 (3g) of the statutes is created to read:SB226,2,139801.50 (3g) For the purposes of sub. (2) (c), a corporation, limited liability 10company, or other business entity shall be deemed to reside in the place of 11incorporation or organization, and a corporation, limited liability company, or other 12business entity shall be deemed to be doing substantial business only in the county 13of its principal place of business.SB226,2,1414